Vermont, session 2025-2026, H263.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495q is added to read:
§ 495q. RIGHT TO DISCONNECT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Emergency” means an unforeseen situation that:
(A) threatens an employee, customer, or the public;
(B) disrupts or shuts down operations; or
(C) causes physical or environmental damage.
VT LEG #380175 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.263
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) “Nonworking hours” means hours before and after an employee’s
assigned hours of work as established by written agreement between the
employer and the employee.
(3) “Pattern of violation” means three or more documented instances of
an employer violating an employee’s right to disconnect.
(4) “Right to disconnect” means, except as provided in subsection (b),
an employee has the right to ignore communications from the employer during
nonworking hours.
(5) “Scheduling” means changes to an employee’s schedule within 24
hours of the start of the employee’s next assigned hours of work.
(b) Exceptions. An employer may contact an employee during nonworking
hours for an emergency or for scheduling.
(c) Policy. An employer shall establish a workplace policy that provides
employees with the right to disconnect from communications from the
employer during nonworking hours. The policy shall not include any
provisions that reduce the rights of employees to be compensated for work
performed or to take time off work.
(d) Administrative penalty. An employee may file a complaint concerning
a pattern of violation of this section with the Commissioner of Labor. If the
Commissioner determines that the employer has violated this section, the
VT LEG #380175 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.263
2025 Page 3 of 3
Commissioner is authorized to assess an administrative penalty of not less than
$100.00.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380175 v.1